Utah statutes.
76-6-205.   Manufacture or possession of instrument for burglary or theft.

Any person who manufactures or possesses any instrument, tool, device, article, or other thing adapted, designed, or commonly used in advancing or facilitating the commission of any offense under circumstances manifesting an intent to use or knowledge that some person intends to use the same in the commission of a burglary or theft is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

